Wisconsin, session 2025, SB183.
do enact as follows:SB183,11Section 1. 79.05 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB183,3,21279.05 (2) (c) Its municipal budget; exclusive of principal and interest on long-3term debt and exclusive of revenue sharing payments under s. 66.0305, payments of 4premiums under s. 66.0137 (5) (c) 1. and 1m., expenditures of amounts levied under 5s. 66.0602 (3) (h), revenues generated from a tax imposed under s. 77.701, payments 6received under s. 79.038, expenditures of payments due to the termination of a tax 7incremental district under s. 79.096 (3), recycling fee payments under s. 289.645, 8expenditures of grant payments under s. 16.297 (1m), unreimbursed expenses 1related to an emergency declared under s. 323.10, expenditures from moneys 2received pursuant to P.L. 111-5, grants received from the state or federal 3government for the purpose of providing law enforcement, fire protection, or 4emergency medical services, and expenditures made pursuant to a purchasing 5agreement with a school district whereby the municipality makes purchases on 6behalf of the school district; for the year of the statement under s. 79.015 increased 7over its municipal budget as adjusted under sub. (6); exclusive of principal and 8interest on long-term debt and exclusive of revenue sharing payments under s. 966.0305, payments of premiums under s. 66.0137 (5) (c) 1. and 1m., expenditures of 10amounts levied under s. 66.0602 (3) (h), revenues generated from a tax imposed 11under s. 77.701, payments received under s. 79.038, expenditures of payments due 12to the termination of a tax incremental district under s. 79.096 (3), recycling fee 13payments under s. 289.645, expenditures of grant payments under s. 16.297 (1m), 14unreimbursed expenses related to an emergency declared under s. 323.10, 15expenditures from moneys received pursuant to P.L. 111-5, grants received from the 16state or federal government for the purpose of providing law enforcement, fire 17protection, or emergency medical services, and expenditures made pursuant to a 18purchasing agreement with a school district whereby the municipality makes 19purchases on behalf of the school district; for the year before that year by less than 20the sum of the inflation factor and the valuation factor, rounded to the nearest 0.10 21percent.SB183,222Section 2. 256.04 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB183,4,723256.04 (3) Annually, no later than September 15, in consultation with the 1department of health services and the technical college system board, submit a 2report to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution to the 3legislature under s. 13.172 (2) on state and national changes to the scope of practice 4of emergency medical responders, emergency medical services practitioners, or any 5equivalent practitioners in other jurisdictions and how those scope of practice 6changes may affect training for emergency medical responders and emergency 7medical services practitioners in this state.SB183,38Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.SB183,4,179(1) Medical Assistance reimbursement rates for nontransport 10ambulance services. For dates of service beginning with January 1, 2027, the 11department of health services shall increase reimbursement rates for services 12provided and reimbursable under the healthcare common procedure coding system 13code A0998 with a description of “ambulance response and treatment, no transport” 14from the current maximum allowable fee to a rate that matches the maximum 15allowable rate for reimbursement of services provided under healthcare common 16procedure coding system code A0429 with a description of “ambulance service, basic 17life support, emergency transport (bls-emergency).”SB183,4,1818